Illinois, session 104th, HB5621.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community Bitcoin Reserve Act. 6    Section 2. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) Bitcoin is a scarce digital asset with a fixed 9    supply of 21 million units and globally verifiable 10    issuance;11        (2) Bitcoin's decentralization and predictable 12    issuance schedule support long-term saving and ownership;13        (3) Many Illinois communities have faced historic 14    barriers to asset ownership and long-horizon financial 15    planning;16        (4) Community-held Bitcoin reserves, combined with 17    education and transparent governance, strengthen financial 18    resilience;19        (5) In 2025, the Illinois House adopted House 20    Resolution 446 recognizing the Altgeld Bitcoin Reserve as 21    the first community-run Bitcoin reserve in the United 22    States;23        (6) Multisignature custody, cold storage, and   HB5621- 2 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1    independent auditing are essential to maintaining public 2    trust; and3        (7) A disciplined, long-term Bitcoin savings model may 4    improve generational outcomes in historically underserved 5    communities. 6    Section 4. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to:7        (1) Establish a first-in-the-nation Community Bitcoin 8    Reserve Program in Illinois;9        (2) Recognize the Altgeld Bitcoin Reserve in Altgeld 10    Gardens as the inaugural community reserve site;11        (3) Demonstrate a long-term, deflationary community 12    savings and stewardship model addressing systemic 13    financial exclusion;14        (4) Support financial literacy, youth mentorship, and 15    local economic resilience;16        (5) Provide a secure and transparent framework for 17    community-held Bitcoin using multisignature cold-storage 18    custody;19        (6) Enable responsible expansion to additional 20    communities under uniform statewide guardrails; and21        (7) Clarify that this Act establishes a savings and 22    stewardship framework, not a speculative, trading, or 23    investment program. 24    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:  HB5621- 3 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1    "ABR" means the Altgeld Bitcoin Reserve.2    "ABR Foundation" means the nonprofit entity that 3administers community programs funded by authorized reserve 4releases.5    "ABR Wealth Fund DAO LLC" means a Wyoming-registered 6limited liability company acting as a designated 7administrative and fiduciary agent under this Act, authorized 8to coordinate multisignature custody, transparency procedures, 9audit compliance, and reporting for the Community Bitcoin 10Reserve, but not acting as a State entity and not as the owner 11of Bitcoin held under this Act.12    "Bitcoin" means a decentralized digital asset secured 13through proof-of-work cryptography, recorded on a public, 14immutable blockchain, with a fixed supply of 21 million units.15    "Cold storage" means an offline method of securely storing 16private keys using hardware devices, physical key materials, 17or other disconnected mediums.18    "Community Bitcoin Reserve" means Bitcoin held in 19multisignature cold-storage custody for the benefit of a 20participating community under this Act.21    "Community-designated keyholder" means a trusted 22individual or entity formally designated by a participating 23community to represent community interests within the 24multisignature custody structure.25    "Custodian" means a regulated digital-asset custodian or 26trust company authorized to securely hold assets for public   HB5621- 4 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1bodies or nonprofit entities.2    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 3Opportunity.4    "Multisignature wallet" means a cryptographic wallet 5requiring multiple independent private keys to authorize a 6transaction.7    "Neutral third-party keyholder" means an individual or 8entity independent of the community, the administrative agent, 9and the custodian, responsible for holding one multisignature 10key.11    "Proof-of-reserve" means cryptographic or audited 12verification demonstrating that Bitcoin reserves are fully 13backed and unencumbered.14    "Program release" means the authorized annual transfer of 15Bitcoin for community programs as described in Section 50. 16    Section 10. Establishment of the program.17    (a) The Community Bitcoin Reserve Program is established 18within the Department.19    (b) The Altgeld Bitcoin Reserve is designated as the first 20community reserve site.21    (c) Additional participating communities may be approved 22by the Department, subject to criteria and oversight 23established by this Act.24    (d) The State of Illinois may acquire Bitcoin for the 25Community Bitcoin Reserve if the acquisition is authorized by   HB5621- 5 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1the General Assembly and conducted in a budget-neutral manner. 2Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require the 3appropriation of new State funds or to create a debt, deficit, 4or contingent liability of the State.5    (e) Any acquisition of Bitcoin by the State under this 6Section shall occur only through budget-neutral mechanisms, 7including, but not limited to:8        (1) reallocation of existing program surpluses or 9    unspent balances;10        (2) use of fee-generated or self-funded accounts not 11    derived from general revenue;12        (3) public-private partnerships, matching funds, or 13    sponsorship arrangements;14        (4) grants, rebates, or settlement proceeds designated 15    for financial innovation or economic development; or16        (5) other mechanisms expressly determined by the 17    General Assembly to be fiscally neutral. 18    Section 15. Custody structure.19    (a) All Bitcoin held under this Act shall be secured using 20multisignature cold-storage custody requiring a minimum 21threshold of approvals.22    (b) The multisignature configuration, including the number 23of keys and approval threshold, shall be determined by the 24Department for each participating community, based on reserve 25size, risk profile, and governance capacity, and shall comply   HB5621- 6 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1with the requirements of this Act.2    (c) At least one multisignature key shall be held by a 3community-designated keyholder representing the participating 4community.5    (d) Additional multisignature keys may be held by:6        (1) ABR Wealth Fund DAO LLC, acting solely as an 7    administrative and fiduciary agent;8        (2) a State-approved regulated custodian; or9        (3) a neutral third-party keyholder.10    (e) No multisignature configuration may permit unilateral 11control by any single entity.12    (f) All custody actions shall be logged, independently 13audited, and included in public reports.14    (g) The Office of the Comptroller shall review and confirm 15all Bitcoin acquisitions under this Act.16    (h) ABR Wealth Fund DAO LLC shall not be deemed the owner 17of Bitcoin held under this Act. 18    Section 20. Transparency and proof-of-reserve.19    (a) Quarterly proof-of-reserve reports are required.20    (b) Annual independent audits of multisignature custody 21are required.22    (c) All reports shall be submitted to the Comptroller for 23public posting.24    (d) Private keys shall never be publicly disclosed.   HB5621- 7 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1    Section 25. Community governance. ABR Wealth Fund DAO LLC, 2acting as the designated agent under this Act, shall oversee:3        (1) multisignature administration;4        (2) custody procedures;5        (3) transparency protocols;6        (4) audit compliance; and7        (5) coordination of authorized program releases. 8    Section 30. Administration of programs.9    (a) The ABR Foundation may administer community programs 10funded by authorized reserve releases.11    (b) The ABR Foundation shall not have custody of the 12Bitcoin.13    (c) Annual program expenditures shall be documented, 14auditable, included in Internal Revenue Form 990 filings, and 15published in public reports.16    (d) No officer, board member, or representative may 17receive improper personal or financial benefit from program 18releases beyond lawful compensation for services rendered. 19    Section 35. Annual program release schedule.20    (a) Bitcoin held under this Act must remain in 21multisignature cold-storage custody for a minimum of 5 years 22from the date of acquisition.23    (b) Beginning in the 6th year following acquisition, 24limited annual Bitcoin releases may occur solely for   HB5621- 8 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1authorized community programs, subject to all audit, 2transparency, and reporting requirements under this Act.3    Any such release shall be limited to a maximum of 0.21 4Bitcoin per year, which shall constitute no more than 1% of the 5total Bitcoin held in the Community Bitcoin Reserve at the 6time of release.7    (c) All Bitcoin released under this Section must be 8applied to programmatic use and shall be administered through 9the ABR Foundation or another authorized program administrator 10in accordance with Section 45.11    Released funds shall support existing community programs 12and community development initiatives and may serve as an 13umbrella funding mechanism for such programs as the Community 14Bitcoin Reserve matures, so long as all uses remain consistent 15with the purposes of this Act.16    (d) The annual program release authorized under this 17Section is a maximum cap, not a guaranteed distribution, and 18may occur only if the release does not impair the long-term 19stewardship or solvency of the Community Bitcoin Reserve.20    (e) No fractional, accelerated, cumulative, or additional 21Bitcoin releases beyond the annual limit set forth in this 22Section may occur without authorization by a future Act of the 23General Assembly. 24    Section 40. Tax treatment. Transfers of Bitcoin from the 25reserve to the ABR Foundation for authorized uses shall not   HB5621- 9 -LRB104 20011 BAB 33462 b1constitute a taxable event under Illinois State tax law, to 2the extent permitted by law. 3    Section 45. Restrictions. Bitcoin held under this Act may 4not be traded, loaned, leveraged, pledged as collateral, or 5used in speculative, derivative, or yield-generating activity. 6    Section 50. Sale or transfer. Bitcoin held under this Act 7may not be sold, liquidated, or transferred, except by a 8future Act of the General Assembly. 9    Section 55. Acceptance of donations. ABR Wealth Fund DAO 10LLC, the ABR Foundation, and the State of Illinois may accept 11Bitcoin donations designated for the Community Bitcoin Reserve 12Program. 13    Section 60. No State liability. The State of Illinois is 14not liable for losses resulting from custodian failure, 15third-party misconduct, or cybersecurity incidents outside the 16responsibilities defined in this Act. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.